Ohio, session 136, SB227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3902.65 of the Revised Code be 3
enacted to read as follows: 4
Sec. 3902.65. (A) As used in this section, "prescription 5
insulin drug" means a prescription drug that contains insulin 6
and is used to treat diabetes. 7
(B) Notwithstanding section 3901.71 of the Revised Code, 8
no health plan issuer that provides coverage for prescription 9
insulin drugs pursuant to the terms of a health benefit plan 10
amended, issued, or renewed on or after the effective date of 11
this section shall require cost sharing for a covered 12
prescription insulin drug in an amount exceeding thirty-five 13
dollars per thirty-day supply of the drug, regardless of the 14
amount or type of insulin needed to fill the covered person's 15
prescription. The cost sharing shall be charged on a per- 16
prescription-fill basis. 17